Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-413
When health care provider may presume validity of declaration.

In the absence of knowledge to the contrary, a physician or other health care provider may assume that a declaration complies with the Rights of the Terminally Ill Act and is valid.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 13.